<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88719-0045 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-19-88.f2.A1044</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 138 / Tuesday, July 19, 1988 /Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Parts 117, 302, and 355</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRL-3207-3]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Reporting Exemptions for Federally Permitted Releases of HazardousSubstances</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>Section 103(a) of the Comprehensive Environmental Response,Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (CERCLA), as amended, requiresthat the person in charge of a vessel or facility from which a hazardoussubstance has been released in a quantity that is equal to or greater thanits reportable quantity (RQ) shall immediately notify the National ResponseCenter of the release. Section 102(b) sets an RQ of one pound of hazardoussubstances, except those for which RQs have been established pursuant tosection 311a(b)(4) of the clean Water Act. Section 102(a) authorizes theU.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) to adjust RQs for hazardoussubstances and to designate as hazardous substances those substances that,when released into the environment, may present substantial danger to thepublic health or welfare or the environment.The notification requirement under sections 103(a) and 103(b) of CERCLAapplies to any release of a hazardous substance ``other than a federallypermitted release.'' Section 101(10) of CERCLA defines ``federally permittedrelease'' in terms of the discharge requirements of a number of State andFederal programs. Section 107(j) of CERCLA also exempts a ``federally permittedrelease'' from liability under CERCLA for response costs and damages incurreddue to the release.The purpose of this rulemaking is to clarify the federally permitted releaseexemption from CERCLA release reporting and liability provisions. Today'sproposed rule also addresses this exemption from the notification requirementsunder Title III of the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of1986. The Agency also proposes in this rule to make conforming changesto the regulation (40 CFR Part 117) describing the notification requirementsfor releases of hazardous substances under section 311 of the Clean WaterAct. Finally, this rulemaking addresses several issues related to whichreleases into the environment require notification under CERCLA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Comments must be submitted on or before September 19, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2><T3>Comments: </T3>Comments should be submitted in triplicate to: EmergencyResponse Division, Superfund Docket Clerk, Attention: Docket Number 101(10)FPR, Room LG-100, U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M Street SW.,Washington, DC 20460.<T3>Docket: </T3>Copies of materials relevant to this rulemaking are keptin Room LG-100, at the above address. The docket is available for inspectionbetween 9:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m. Monday through Friday, excluding Federalholidays. Appointments to review the docket can be made by calling 202/382-3046.As provided in 40 CFR Part 2, a reasonable fee (the first 50 pages arefree and each additional page costs $.20) may be charged for copying services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2><ITAG tagnum="15">Mr. Hubert Watters, Project Officer, Response Standards and CriteriaBranch, Emergency Response Division (WH-548B), U.S. Environmental ProtectionAgency, 401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460, (202) 382-2463;</ITAG>  or the<ITAG tagnum="15">RCRA/Superfund Hotline, 1-800/424-9356; in Washington, DC, 1-202/382-3000.</ITAG>The toll-free telephone number of the National Response Center is 1-800/424-8802;in the Washington, DC metropolitan area, the number is 1-202/426-2675.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The contents of today's preamble arelisted in the following outline:<ITAG tagnum="26">I. Introduction and General Comments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Background</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Relationship to Reporting Under Title III</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">II. Elements of the Exemption</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">III. Notification for Certain Types of Releases</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. In General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. PCB Waste Disposal</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IV. Dischareges to POTWs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">V. Regulatory Analyses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Executive Order No. 12291</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Introduction and General Comments</ITAG>A. BackgroundThe Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Actof 1980 (Pub. L. 96-510), 42 U.S.C. 9601 <T3>et seq. </T3>(CERCLA or the Act), enacted on December 11, 1980, andamended by the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 (SARA)(Pub. L. 99-499), establishes broad Federal authority to respond to releasesor threats of releases of hazardous substances from vessels and facilities.Section 101(14) of CERCLA defines the term ``hazardous substances'' chieflyby reference to other environmental statutes with authority further grantedto the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) to designate additionalhazardous substances under CERCLA section 102(a). The CERCLA list currentlycontains 721 hazardous substances.Section 103(a) of the Act requires that, as soon as the person in chargeof a vessel or facility has knowledge of a release of a hazardous substancefrom such vessel or facility in a quantity equal to or greater than thereportable quantity (RQ) for that substance, the person shall notify theNational Response Center immediately. Section 102(b) of CERCLA establishesRQs for releases of hazardous substances at one pound, except for thosesubstances whose RQs were established at a different level pursuant tosection 311(b)(4) of the Clean Water Act (CWA). Section 102(a) of CERCLAauthorizes the EPA Administrator to adjust all of these RQs by regulation(see 40 CFR 302.4).Section 109 of CERCLA and section 325 of SARA Title III authorize EPA toassess civil penalties for failure to report releases of hazardous substancesthat equal or exceed their RQs. Section 103 of CERCLA, as amended, authorizesEPA to seek criminal penalties for submitting false or misleading informationin a notification made pursuant to CERCLA section 103, and increases themaximum penalties and years of imprisonment for violation of the CERCLAsection 103 reporting requirement.One of the exemptions from section 103 reporting requirements is for ``federallypermitted releases.'' The definition of ``federally permitted release''in CERCLA section 101(10) specifically identifies releases permitted underother environmental statutes, including the following general types ofreleases:andbullet; Discharges covered by a National Pollutant Discharge EliminationSystem (NPDES) permit, permit application, or permit administrative record;andbullet; Discharges in compliance with a legally enforceable permit fordredged or fill materials under section 404 of the CWA;andbullet; Releases in compliance with a legally enforceable Resource Conservationand Recovery Act (RCRA) hazardous waste management facility final permit;andbullet; Releases in compliance with a legally enforceable permit underthe Marine Protection, Research, and Sanctuaries Act;andbullet; Any injections of fluids authorized under federally approved undergroundinjection control programs (including federally authorized State programs)pursuant to Part C of the Safe Drinking Water Act;andbullet; Any air emissions subject to permit or control regulations undercertain provisions of the Clean Air Act (CAA);andbullet; Any injections of fluids or other materials authorized by applicableState law for the purpose of stimulating or treating wells for the productionof crude oil, natural gas, or water, or for other production or enhancedrecovery purposes;andbullet; The introduction of any pollutant into a publicly owned treatmentworks when such pollutant is specified in and in compliance with pretreatmentstandards and a pretreatment program submitted to EPA for approval; andandbullet; Any release of source, special nuclear, or byproduct materialin compliance with a legally enforceable license, permit, regulation, ororder issued pursuant to the Atomic Energy Act.In the May 25, 1983 Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) (48 FR 23552)to adjust certain RQs, EPA explained the Agency's interpretation of eachof the types of releases exempted by the definition of ``federally permittedrelease.'' EPA has decided to repropose the rule for federally permittedreleases today rather than publish a final rule because of the amount oftime that has passed since the original proposal. Today's proposed regulationwould add a definition of ``federally permitted release'' to 40 CFR 302.3,Definitions.\1\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Further, today's proposal revises the definition of ``release''to reflect SARA amendments to CERCLA section 101(22).EPA received many comments on various aspects of the federally permittedrelease exemption, most of which urged a broader interpretation of oneor more of the exemption categories. General comments on the scope of theexemption are discussed below, followed by discussion of comments on specifictypes of federally permitted releases.Several commenters discussed the potential duplication between CERCLA reportingrequirements and reporting requirements under existing permit programsfor releases exceeding levels set by the terms of the permit. These commenterssuggested that, because permit programs already may require notificationof a regulatory authority in the event of a release exceeding permit levels,such releases should be exempt from notification when permitted levelsare exceeded by an RQ or more. CERCLA section 101(10), however, generallylimits the federally permitted release exemption to those releases ``incompliance with'' permitted or regulatory requirements. A straightforwardinterpretation of the statute indicates that if a release exceeds permittedlevels, it is not ``in compliance with'' the permit and cannot be ``federallypermitted.'' Therefore, if the amount of the release exceeding the permittedlevel, i.e., the portion of the release that is not federally permitted,is equal to or exceeds the RQ, the release must be reported immediatelyto the National Response Center. This approach also avoids the numerousand unnecessary reports that could be generated by the reporting of smallpermit excursions that are better addressed by the permitting authority.EPA believes that its interpretation is required by the plain languageof the statute and is essential to ensure adequate protection of publichealth and the environment. The Agency believes that CERCLA reporting andreporting under permit programs is not duplicative because there are significantdifferences between the purposes served by CERCLA notification and thepurposes of permit programs. The permit notification requirements and theinformation that is reported under permit programs may differ from oneprogram to another. If permit notification requirements were allowed tosuffice for CERCLA notification, the information available to the CERCLAprogram on releases might be inconsistent and incomplete. Permit programsalso differ in their reporting mechanisms and do not always require immediatenotification. In some cases, releases in excess of permitted levels needonly be reported at specific intervals (e.g., monthly). Moreover, releasesin excess of permit levels are reported to different Federal and Stateauthorities, depending upon the permit. CERCLA requires immediate notificationto a central office, the National Response Center, as soon as the personin charge has knowledge of a release equal to or exceeding an RQ, so thattimely response may be initiated if the appropriate government authoritydetermines that the release may present substantial danger to public healthor the environment.Moreover, EPA is not convinced that requiring persons in charge of a vesselor facility to make additional telephone calls (to the National ResponseCenter, the local community emergency coordinator, and the State emergencyresponse commission) to a toll-free or local number constitutes an undueburden on the regulated community. The Agency seeks comments on its interpretationof the burdens and the benefits of requiring reporting under CERCLA andFederal or State permit programs.Several commenters recommended that releases be considered federally permittedreleases (and therefore exempt from CERCLA notification and liability provisions)if they are exempt from regulation by the statutes listed in CERCLA section101(10). EPA believes that exempting such releases would be contrary tothe purpose of the notification requirements, which is to protect humanhealth and the environment by requiring that responsible authorities benotified of releases that may require a timely response. The exemptionof a type of release from regulation under a particular statute may havelittle or no bearing on whether a Federal response action might be neededfor a specific release.Examples illustrate the disparate reasons for exemptions. For instance,owners or operators of certain solid waste disposal facilities that handlehazardous waste only from generators of less than 100 kg. per month ofnonacutely hazardous waste (See 40 CFR 261.5) are exempt from the requirementto obtain a hazardous waste management facility permit under section 3005of RCRA. The exemption is based on a balancing of the administrative burdenof including such wastes in the Subtitle C system against the threat theAgency determined would be posed by disposing of the wastes in unpermittedfacilities (45 FR 33066, 33102-33105 (May 19, 1980)). Certain types ofhazardous waste recycling activities_for example, the act of reclamationof a hazardous waste or burning a hazardous waste in a boiler or industrialfurnace to recover energy_are exempt from regulation while EPA determinesappropriate regulatory regimes for these activities. (See 40 CFR 261.6and 40 CFR Part 266). Under the CWA, electroplating facilities that produce1000 gallons of effluent per day are exempted from effluent standards becausecompliance is economically infeasible for these small firms (39 FR 11510,March 28, 1974). In each instance, the release may require response action,and the fact that the release is exempted from the statutory requirementsis not relevant to this determination. The Agency has determined, therefore,that releases exempted from regulation by the statutes listed in section101(10) will not be considered federally permitted releases.Although certain releases may not qualify as federally permitted, theymay not pose a sufficient hazard to warrant reporting to the National ResponseCenter. The Administrator will consider establishing an administrativeexemption from CERCLA notification requirements if it appears that certainreleases pose no hazard or pose a hazard only rarely and under circumstancesthat would not likely result in any action being taken to respond to thehazard. However, no such exemptions are proposed under this regulation.One commenter requested that a release still be considered a federallypermitted release when there is only a ``technical'' violation of permitconditions (i.e., where the violation relates to operating, monitoring,or reporting procedures and does not affect the character or quantity ofthe release). EPA agrees that notification of the National Response Centerwould be unnecessary in such a case and should be addressed by the permitprograms, where appropriate, as a permit violation. If the characteristicsof a release (both the substance involved and the quantity or concentrationare in compliance with a permit described in section 101(10), CERCLA notificationwill not be required. However, to the extent that a release exceeds thepermit limit with regard to the quantity of a hazardous substance, it willnot be considered a federally permitted release and CERCLA notificationwill be required when the release of the hazardous substance exceeds itspermitted level by an RQ or more. Some Federal permit programs do not includequantitative limits on the amounts of specific hazardous substances thatcan be released. Accordingly, no ``permitted level'' exists against whichthe released quantity can be compared to determine whether CERCLA notificationis required (i.e., whether the permitted level has been exceeded by anRQ or more). In such cases, CERCLA notification will be required when thecharacteristics of the release are not in compliance with the permit (e.g.,the allowable concentration of a particular constituent has been exceeded)and an RQ or more of a hazardous substance has been released.Several commenters urged that various types of releases (such as all ``routine''releases or releases covered by other permit programs) not mentioned insection 101(10) be considered federally permitted release. EPA cannot supportthis position. Federally permitted releases are specifically listed insection 101(10). This detailed list clearly indicated that Congress didnot intend releases other than those listed in section 101(10) to be consideredfederally permitted and thereby exempt from CERCLA reporting and liabilityrequirements.B. Relationship to Reporting Under Title IIITitle III of SARA (sections 301-329) addresses emergency planning and communityright-to-know and provides, among other things, emergency and annual notificationrequirements in addition to those included in section 103 of CERCLA. EPAhas provided (see 52 FR 13377, April 22, 1987; 52 FR 21152, June 4, 1987)and will continue to provide regulations and guidance on the Title IIIrequirements as necessary and appropriate.With respect to emergency notification requirements, section 304 of SARAprovides release reporting requirements that parallel the requirementsof section 103(a) but are intended to make release information immediatelyavailable to State and local emergency officials as well as Federal responseofficials notified under CERCLA section 103. In addition, section 304(a)requires reporting of (1) releases for which notification is required undersection 103(a) of CERCLA, and (2) releases of ``extremely hazardous substances''that are not hazardous substances under CERCLA but that ``occur in a mannerwhich would require notification under section 103(a)'' of CERCLA. Federallypermitted releases, as defined by CERCLA section 101(10), are not requiredto be reported under section 304 of SARA (see 52 FR 13383). To clarifythe type of releases that are defined as federally permitted releases,and thereby exempt from SARA section 304 reporting, today's rule proposesto revise the applicability section of the regulation implementing section304 (40 CFR 355.40(a)) to add the definition of ``federally permitted releases''provided in this rule. Thus, the interpretation of federally permittedrelease proposed in today's rule will define clearly the scope of the releasesreportable under SARA section 304. With respect to annual notificationof toxic chemical releases required under SARA section 313, however, federallypermitted releases are not exempt.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Elements of the Exemption</ITAG>Each element of the federally permitted release exemption is discussedbelow. Relevant comments received on the may 25, 1983, NPRM pertainingto each element also are discussed.<T3>Releases from Point Sources with National Pollutant Discharge EliminationSystem (NPDES) Permits. Introduction. </T3>Section 101(10) identifies threetypes of releases from point sources with NPDES permits as federally permittedreleases:<ITAG tagnum="21">(A) discharges in compliance with a permit under section 402 of theFederal Water Pollution Control Act, (B) discharges resulting from circumstancesidentified and reviewed and made part of the public record with respectto a permit issued or modified under section 402 of the Federal Water PollutionControl Act and subject to a condition of such permit, (C) continuous oranticipated intermittent discharges from a point source, identified ina permit or permit application under section 402 of the Federal Water PollutionControl Act, which are caused by events occurring within the scope of relevantoperating or treatment systems * * *.</ITAG>This language is identical to that used in section 311(a)(2) of the CWAto exclude these releases from the term ``discharge'' with respect to EPA'soil and hazardous substances spill response and prevention program. Furthermore,Congress intended, in enacting CERCLA section 101(10) (A), (B), and (C),that EPA's interpretation of the provisions under the CWA be continuedunder CERCLA. (See S. Rep. No. 848, 96th Cong., 2nd Sess. 47 (1980).) Reflectiveof Congressional intent, the Agency proposes today that the interpretationprovided in the regulatory language and the preambles to the rules implementingthe CWA section 311(a)(2) exclusions be applied to the same exemptionsunder CERCLA section 101(10) (A), (B), and (C).  The legislative history of the CWA explains that the purpose of the section311 exemptions was to exclude from the spill response provisions of section311 three types of discharges subject to regulation under other CWA provisions;specifically, section 402 NPDES permits and section 309 enforcement provisions.Senator Stafford explained that:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * we are attempting to draw a line between the provisions of the[CWA] under sections 301, 304, 402 regulating chronic discharges and 311dealing with spills. At the extremes, it is relatively easy to focus onthe difference but it can become complicated. The concept can be summarizedby stating that those discharges of pollutants that a reasonable man wouldconclude are associated with permits, permit conditions, operation of treatmenttechnology and permit violations would result in 402/309 sanctions; thosedischarges of pollutants that a reasonable man would conclude are episodicor classical spills not intended or capable of being processed throughthe permitted treatment system and outfall would result in the applicationof section 311. (124 Congressional Record 37683 (1978).)</ITAG>In 1979, the Agency promulgated 40 CFR Part 117, which contains CWA reportingrequirements for discharges of hazardous substances (44 FR 50776, August29, 1979). Section 117.12 provided a regulatory interpretation of the threeexclusions to the defintion of ``discharge'' in 40 CFR Part 116 and CWAsection 311(a)(2), and the preamble to the rule provided a detailed explanationof the three types of excluded discharges. In 1987, EPA amended the definitionof ``discharge'' in 40 CFR Part 110, the discharge of oil regulation, tocodify the same three CWA exclusions (52 FR 10712, April 2, 1987). Thepreamble to the oil discharge rule adopted the description of the threeexclusions from the 1979 preamble to 40 CFR Part 117.  In today's rule, the Agency proposes to apply the existing interpretationof the three types of discharges that are excluded from coverage underCWA section 311 to the first three types of discharges under CERCLA section101(10). Thus, this interpretation will apply to the following regulatoryprovisions: 40 CFR 110.1, 116.3, 117.12, 300.5, 302.3, and 335.40. TheAgency, however, also is proposing to make two clarifying amendments to40 CFR 117.12, as explained below, that also will be aplicable to the correspondingexemptions under 40 CFR Parts 110, 116, 300, 302, and 355.  In the paragraphs that follow, the three types of NPDES discharges thatcorrespond to the federally permitted releases in CERCLA sections 101(10)(A), (B), and (C) are described. For simplicity, these discharges willbe referred to as Type A, B, and C, respectively.  <T3>Type A Discharges.</T3> Type A discharges are those that are in compliancewith an NPDES permit limit that specifically addreses the discharge inquestion. To qualify as a Type A discharge, the permit must either addressthe discharge directly through specific effluent limitations or throughthe use of indicator pollutants. In the case of the latter, the administrativerecord prepared during permit development must identify specifically thedischarge of the pollutant as one of those pollutants the indicator isintended to represent.  <T3>Type B Discharges.</T3> Type B discharges are foreseeable (i.e., identifiedin the NPDES permit's development record) and flow into a facility's effluenttreatment system designed to treat the discharge. This second type of dischargeis limited to on-site spills to the permitted treatment system that wereidentified and considered in the issuance of the permit but are not subjectto any specific effluent limitations. Discharges are included only where(1) the source, nature, and amount of a potential discharge were identifiedand made part of the public record, and (2) the permit contained a conditionrequiring that the treatment system be capable of eliminating or abatingthe potential discharge.  Therefore, if an on-site spill was processed through a treatment systemcapable of eliminating or abating the spill, and the spill is subject toa permit condition, a discharge resulting from the on-site spill wouldbe subject to CWA sections 402 and 309 and would be a federally permittedrelease. If an on-site spill is not passed through a treatment system oris not otherwise treated in any way, the discharge resulting from the on-sitespill is subject to CWA section 311 and is not a federally permitted release.Also, discharges that result from on-site spills that are passed throughtreatment systems (1) that have not been demonstrated as capable of eliminatingor abating the discharge or (2) for which no permit condition exists aresubject to CWA section 311 and are not federally permitted releases underCERCLA.  A ``permit condition'' would include the existence of a treatment systemor release prevention plans and other best management practices designedto address the discharge. Best management practices are operating methodsor procedures to prevent or minimize the potential for the discharge oftoxic or hazardous substances from processes ancillary to the industrialmanufacturing or treatment process. For example, a discharger has a drainagesystem that will route spilled material from a broken hose connection toa holding tank or basin for subsequent treatment or discharge at a specifiedrate. To be eligible as a Type B discharge, the discharger must identifyspecifically such a system in the permit application. The permit conditiondiscussed in the application must be sufficient to treat the maximum potentialspill from the identified source. Discharges that result from an on-sitespill larger and more concentrated than the spill contemplated in the publicrecord, and for which a condition was provided in the permit, will be subjectto CWA section 311 and CERCLA notification and liability provisions (i.e.,the discharge will not be a federally permitted release).Today's rule proposes to amend 40 CFR 117.12(c) by deleting the phrase``whether or not the discharge is in compliance with the permit,'' forType B discharges, to avoid confusion caused by the phrase. The phrasewas originally included in the rule because Type B discharges are dischargesthat result from circumstances identified and considered in the issuanceof a permit but that are not subject to any specific effluent limitations.The Agency is concerned that the phrase may be interpreted incorrectlyto mean that Type B could refer to discharges in which the permittee didnot satisfy the condition placed in the permit. Because the Agency believesthat the phrase causes confusion, the Agency proposes to delete the phrasefrom the regulation. The Agency solicits comments on this proposed revisionto 40 CFR 117.12(c). <T3>Type C Discharges.</T3> Type C discharges are from a point source andare (1) continuous or anticipated intermittent discharges, (2) identifiedin a permit or permit application, and (3) caused by events occurring withinthe scope of the relevant operating and treatment systems. Included withinthe scope of this provision are chronic, process-related discharges resultingfrom periodic upsets in the manufacturing and treatment systems, for example,the discharge created by a system backwash. Discharges caused by spillsor episodic events that release hazardous substances to the manufacturingor treatment systems are not Type C discharges. The language of 40 CFR117.12(d) provides further examples of discharges that fit within the category:(1) Provided that an on-site spill is not the cause, contamination of noncontactcooling water or storm water; (2) an upset or failure of a treatment systemor of a process producing a continuous or anticipated intermittent discharge;or (3) where the discharge originates in the manufacturing or treatmentsystems, a continuous or anticipated discharge of process waste water.<T3>Amendment to 40 CFR 117.12.</T3> With respect to Type C discharges,the Agency also is proposing in today's rule to amend 40 CFR 117.12(d)(2)(iii)by deleting the term ``operator error'' from the description of ``an upsetor failure of a treatment system.''\2\<NOTE/> The reasons for the proposal to eliminate the term ``operatorerror'' are: (1) The use of the term ``operator error'' in describing anupset is inconsistent with the NPDES regulations (40 CFR 122.41) that providethat a discharge caused by an operator error is not an upset; and (2) theAgency believes that discharges caused by operator error are not likelyto be ``continuous or anticipated intermittent discharges,'' as providedby the statutory language. The Agency expects discharges caused by operatorerror to be episodic and unpredictable, as compared to discharges causedby system startups and shutdowns. The proposed deletion of the term ``operatorerror'' is intended to enhance the clarity and consistency of the regulatorylanguage and is not meant to signal a change in policy. It is possiblethat under some circumstances an operator error may cause a failure ofa treatment system or process, and produce a continuous or anticipatedintermittent discharge. Such a discharge may meet the requirements fora federally permitted release. The term ``upset'' as used in 40 CFR Part117, however, generally will be interpreted to be consistent with the term``upset'' in 40 CFR Part 122, i.e., it does not include incidents causedby operational error. The Agency requests comments on its proposal to deleteoperator error from 40 CFR 117.12(d)(2)(iii). <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\Section 117.12(d)(2)(iii) presently states: <ITAG tagnum="28">(iii) An upset or failure of a treatment system or of a process producinga continuous or anticipated intermittent discharge where the upset or failureresults from a control problem, an operator error, a system failure ormalfunction, an equipment or system startup or shutdown, an equipment wash,or a production schedule change, provided that such upset or failure isnot caused by an on-site spill of a hazardous substance. </ITAG><T3>Conclusion.</T3> Under both CWA section 311 and CERCLA, any dischargeor release of a hazardous substance that is not federally permitted, asdescribed above, must be reported immediately to the National ResponseCenter if it exceeds permit limits by an RQ or more; if the hazardous substancedischarge or release is not subject to a numerical permit limit, any dischargeor release that triggers a permit violation and equals or exceeds an RQmust be reported immediately. Similarly, under 40 CFR Part 110, any oildischarge that exceeds permitted levels and causes an oil sheen must bereported immediately. Discharges excluded from CWA section 311 coverage and defined as federallypermitted releases under CERCLA sections 101(10) (A), (B), and (C) aresubject to the CWA section 309 enforcement provision that provides EPAwith the authority to issue compliance orders, bring civil actions, andimpose criminal and civil penalties. In addition, under CWA section 311(b)(6)(D),if the Federal government incurs any costs of removal of discharges excludedby section 311(a)(2)(C), the Federal government can bring a civil actionunder the authority provided by CWA section 309(b) to recover such removalcosts. Furthermore, under CERCLA section 107(j), the response costs incurredby the Federal government in connection with the federally permitted releasesdefined by section 101(10) (B) and (C) can be recovered through a civilaction brought under the authority of CWA section 309(b). Finally, all three exemptions raise the issue of timeliness of notification.The reporting requirements for releases exempted from CERCLA reportingand liability under section 101(10) (A), (B), and (C) and excluded fromCWA section 311(a)(2) are subject to the 24-hour notification requirementsunder CWA section 402. The Agency acknowledges that Congress recognizedthat the 24-hour reporting requirement may ``create gaps in action necessaryto protect the public or the environment.'' (See S. Rep. No. 848, 96thCong., 2nd Sess. 47 (1980).) The legislative history of section 101(10)suggests that the Agency could resolve this issue by amending the CWA section402 reporting regulation to require that those releases excluded from CWAsection 311 coverage and exempt from CERCLA reporting requirements be subjectto an immediate notification requirement under the CWA section 402 NPDESregulations. (Ibid.) The Agency has not yet amended the NPDES regulationsto require immediate notification of those releases exempt from section311 and CERCLA. Before the Agency proposes to amend the CWA sectin 402NPDES regulations (40 CFR Part 122) to revise the 24-hour notificationrequirement to an immediate notification requirement for the exempted releases,the Agency solicits comments on the ``reporting gap,'' particularly examplesof situations where the 24-hour notice was not sufficient to protect humanhealth and the environment. <T3>Releases Subject to CWA Section 404 Permits. </T3>Discharges that complywith a legally enforceable permit for dredge or fill materials under section404 of the CWA also are federally permitted releases exempted from thenotification requirements of CERCLA sections 103(a) and 103(b). Beforeissuing these permits, the government reviews the substances to be discharged.Permits allowing the discharge of hazardous substances are issued onlyif no significant degradation of the aquatic environment will result. Thisexemption applies to discharges in compliance with the terms and conditionsof either an individual or a general CWA section 404 permit.In regulations implementing section 311 of the CWA for hazardous substances,40 CFR 117.12 (but not the regulations for oil in 40 CFR Part 110), EPAexempted from the notification requirement not only those releases thatwere in compliance with section 404 permits, but also those releases thatwere exempt from permit requirements under section 404 of the CWA (sections404(f) and 404(r)). These latter releases are not ``federally permittedreleases'' for purposes of CERCLA because section 101(10)(D) is limitedto releases in compliance with a legally enforceable permit under section404 of the CWA. The Agency interprets the CERCLA notification requirementsto exempt only those releases whose environmental and health effects havebeen evaluated and determined to be allowable under the appropriate permitprogram.<T3>Releases from Facilities with Final RCRA Permits. </T3>Releases incompliance with a legally enforceable RCRA treatment, storage, or disposalfinal permit are, pursuant to CERCLA section 101(10)(E), federally permittedreleases when the hazardous substances released are specified in the permitand subject under the permit to a specific limitation, standard, or controlprocedure (see 40 CFR Parts 264 and 270). Identifying releases on the recordduring the permit process is insufficient to qualify them for the section101(10)(E) exemption because, in order to be exempt, the substances mustbe specified in the permit and subject to some permit condition or control.Four commenters requested that facilities with interim status pursuantto section 3005(e) of RCRA and 40 CFR Part 265 be included in the ``federallypermitted release'' definition. Some of the commenters indicated that itmay be some time before these facilities are issued final permits. Thelegislative history specifically rejects application of this exclusionto releases from facilities with interim status (S. Rep. No. 848, 96thCong., 2nd Sess. 48 (1980)).<T3>Releases Pursuant to Marine Protection, Research, and Sanctuaries ActPermits. </T3>Section 101(10)(F) of CERCLA includes, in the definitionof a federally permitted release, releases in compliance with legally enforceablepermits issued under section 1202 (EPA ocean dumping permits) or section103 (Corps of Engineers permits for ocean dumping of dredged materials)of the Marine Protection, Research, and Sanctuaries Act. Pursuant to EPAregulations, applicants for ocean dumping permits must identify the physicaland chemical properties of the materials to be discharged, and the permitmust identify the materials that may be discharged (see 40 CFR Parts 221and 227). Similar procedures and criteria apply to permits for ocean dumpingof dredged material (see 33 CFR Part 324). These EPA and Corps of Engineerspermits cover substances that can be discharged lawfully. Dumping of hazardoussubstances not specifically, allowed in these permits is subject to thenotification requirements of CERCLA section 103(a) because emergency responseofficials should be made aware of releases not evaluated previously bya permit program for health and environmental effects.<T3>Underground Injections Authorized Pursuant to the Safe Drinking WaterAct. </T3>CERCLA section 101(10)(G) exempts from the notification requirements``any injection of fluids'' authorized under Federal injection controlprograms or State programs submitted for Federal approval pursuant to PartC of the Safe Drinking Water Act (and not disapproved by EPA).EPA has published regulations establishing technical standards and criteria(40 CFR Part 146) and regulations governing approval of State programsand permit procedures (40 CFR Parts 122-124). Under the Safe Drinking WaterAct, the States are to take the primary role in implementing the undergroundinjection control program; EPA is to administer the program only if theState fails to submit an approvable program within a specified time period.Any underground injection of hazardous substances permitted under a Stateprogram that has been approved, or submitted and not disapproved by EPA,or permitted under an EPA-administered program, is considered federallypermitted for purposes of CERCLA notification.<T3>Emissions Subject to Clean Air Act Controls. </T3>Section 101(10)(H)of CERCLA provides an exemption for hazardous substance emissions thatare subject to a Clean Air Act (CAA) permit or control regulation (see40 CFR Parts 52, 60, 61, and 62). However, as stated in the preamble tothe May 25, 1983 NPRM, for this exemption to apply, any such CAA controlsmust be ``specifically designed to limit or eliminate emissions of a designatedhazardous pollutant or a criteria pollutant.'' (See S. Rep. No. 848, 96thCong., 2nd Sess. 49 (1980)). The CAA exemption, therefore, cannot be readbroadly to cover any and all types of air emissions. Moreover, as today'sproposed rule makes clear, for the exemption to apply, the emission mustbe in compliance with the applicable permit or control regulation.Several commenters suggested that the clear and unequivocal nature of thestatutory language made elaboration on the CAA exemption unnecessary. Generally,these commenters took the view that the CAA exemption covers nearly allair emissions because such emissions are in one way or another controlledby the CAA_either directly because they contain substances specificallyregulated by the CAA, or indirectly, for example, through emission limitationsestablished as part of State Implementation Plans (SIPs) approved undersection 110 of the CAA. Some commenters even claimed that because controlscould be developed for any hazardous substance, any release to the airis ``subject'' to CAA controls. EPA does not agree that the broadest interpretations, under which virtuallyall air emissions including dangerous episodic releases would be exemptfrom CERCLA reporting requirements, could have been intended by Congressunder section 101(10). Moreover, the exemption for ``federally permittedreleases'' under CERCLA section 101(10) also applies to reporting of airreleases to State and local governments under Title III of SARA. TitleIII, which is the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of1986, was enacted in large part as a response to dangers posed by chemicalair releases to surrounding communities, such as the catastrophic releaseof methyl isocyanate in Bhopal, India. Because Title III was intended toaddress particularly the dangers of air releases, interpreting the exclusionfor federally permitted releases so that accidental air releases wouldnot be reported locally would be directly contrary to the legislative purpose.Similarly, the purpose of notification requirements under section 103 ofCERCLA is to ensure that the government is informed of any potentiallydangerous releases of hazardous substances to the environment for whichtimely response may be necessary. Establishing a very broad interpretationof CAA controls, as requested by the commenters, could eliminate virtuallyany CERCLA reporting of air emissions and, thus, the potential for earlyFederal responses; such an approach would eviscerate not only the Congressionalintent but also the major purpose of the section 103 notification requirement.In addition, some commenters urged EPA to interpret the federally permittedrelease exemption to include any air emission from a permitted source.Some of the commenters used the word ``reviewed'' almost interchangeablywith the word ``permitted.'' A ``reviewed'' release is not necessarilya ``permitted'' release or a controlled release. A permitted release isan allowable release of a specific substance or emission. A reviewed releasegenerally may be one of many releases from a permitted source that is beingchecked for compliance with a variety of laws and regulations. The inclusionof a pollutant is a SIP review provision is not equivalent to subjectingthe pollutant to CAA requirements or controls ``designed specifically tolimit or eliminate'' the pollutant. (See S. Rep. No. 848, 96th Cong., 2ndSess. 49 (1980)). A reviewed release, therefore, is not necessarily a federallypermitted release. Several commenters stated that the air release exemption should apply broadlyto substances such as volatile organic compounds (VOC) or total suspendedparticulates (TSP) regulated under the CAA (including those regulated underapproved State programs). The commenters claimed that a permit or regulatorylimit on such categorical emissions in effect constitutes a limit on eachconstituent in the group. EPA generally agrees with this position, butagain is concerned that an overbroad interpretation of the air releaseexemption could result in nonreporting of dangerous chemical releases.A large release of a substance from a pressure release valve over a shortperiod of time could be within a VOC limit established for a source, yetcould pose a threat to nearby residents. Although the categorical limitsindirectly restrict each constituent, those limits were established basedon routine emissions over a specific averaging time, and were not predicatedon an upset or excursion from normal operations. The Agency does not believe,therefore, that such an upset or excursion should be considered ``permitted''within the meaning of section 101(10)(H) of CERCLA. EPA is soliciting public comment today on three approaches to distinguishingemissions permitted under the CAA from releases that could create potentialhazards to surrounding areas and for which timely notification under CERCLAand Title III is necessary. Under the first approach, EPA would interpretthe air release exemption in a manner similar to the exemption for releasesregulated under the CWA. Thus, air releases would be permitted to the extentthat the constituent hazardous substances have been identified, reviewed,and made part of the public record during the permit issuance, State implementationplan, or regulation development process for the pollutant that includesthe hazardous substance. The exemption would not extend to releases ofconstituent hazardous substances of a permitted or regulated pollutantcategory that are not identified expressly on the record with respect tothe applicable permit or control program. Once the constituent hazardoussubstance had been identified and reviewed appropriately, the limitationon the category of emissions of hazardous substances would provide the``permit or control regulation'' needed for application of the section101(10)(H) exemption. A specific issue on which the Agency solicits commentsis the inclusion of negative determinations under the CAA section 112 programin the exemption. The second approach would interpret broadly the regulatory programs governingpollutants for which a National Ambient Air Quality Standard (NAAQS) hasbeen established under CAA section 109. These programs are developed underCAA section 111 New Source Performance Standards (NSPS) or CAA section110 State Implementation Plans (SIPs). Under this approach, EPA would distinguishbetween emissions of hazardous substances that are VOCs and regulated asprecursors of ozone, and constituents of the other NAAQS pollutants. Forexample, emissions of constituents of particulate matter would be considered``subject to a permit or control regulation'' and, therefore, exempt fromnotification requirements. Emissions of individual VOCs, however, wouldnot be considered subject to permit or control regulations solely becausethey are indirectly controlled by regulations limiting total VOC emissions.These emissions of individual VOCs in amounts equal to or in excess ofan RQ, consequently, would be subject to notification requirements. This approach is based on the recognition that for five of the presentNAAQS (sulfur dioxide, particulate matter, nitrogen oxides, lead, and carbonmonoxide) the standards in each case are based on the evidence of healtheffects of those emissions. In contrast, emissions of VOCs are regulatedbased on their reactivity and consequent contribution to the creation ofambient ozone levels for which NAAQS have been set. In setting the ozoneNAAQS or establishing emission limitations for VOCs, no consideration wasgiven to any direct health effects of ambient concentrations of total orany constituent VOC. As a result, interpreting VOC emission limitationsto subsume consideration of the possible health effects of constituentsappears to be inappropriate. Using this interpretation, a substance wouldbe considered federally permitted if it is a constituent of, and, therefore,limited by regulations or standards for, any of the five pollutants enumeratedabove, but not if it is limited by standards for VOCs.Reportable quantities for the purpose of release notification requirementsare established to ensure appropriate response to episodic releases ofhazardous substances that have potential adverse health and environmentaleffects. A large release of an individual VOC in a quantity equal to orin excess of an RQ may be within total VOC emission limits and may makea negligible contribution to ozone formation, which is affected by photochemicalconditions, meteorology, and the contributions of other VOC sources. Sucha release may, nonetheless, potentially endanger human health because ofthe toxicity of the individual substance. For example, under CAA section 111, EPA established controls on the rubbertire manufacturing industry limiting VOC emissions for a medium-sized plantto approximately 400 tons per year, or about 1.1 tons per day. PredominantVOCs emitted in the manufacturing process are white gasoline and petroleumnaptha. Toluene, xylene, ketones, and esters are also used throughout theindustry. (48 FR 2676, September 15, 1983.) A release on one day of anRQ or more of one of these VOC constituents, such as 1000 pounds of toluene,although within the total VOC release limit of approximately 1 ton perday may pose a threat to human health or the environment because the totalVOC limitation is based on controlling the formation of ozone, and noton the toxicity of toluene or another of the VOC emission constituents.The Agency would take the position that interpreting NSPS or SIP VOC emissionlimitations to subsume consideration of the possible health effects ofsuch VOC constituents, and thereby exempt them from notification requirements,is inappropriate. Thus, EPA would require notification of releases of VOCconstituents in amounts equivalent to or greater than an RQ under the secondapproach. As a third option, EPA could interpret the CAA federally permitted releaseexclusion to apply only to releases that are subject to a CAA permit orcontrol regulation and that are either the ``routine'' emissions for whichthe permit or control regulation was designed or in compliance with a specificstandard for release of that substance specified in the permit or regulation.Unpermitted, nonroutine releases would include upsets from such devicesas pressure release valves, storage tank reactor vessels, or sudden releasesfrom valve and pipe ruptures, equipment failure, and emergency startupsand shutdowns. EPA requests comments on these alternatives for defining the scope of theair release exemption. Specifically, EPA requests comments distinguishingreleases of ozone precursors (VOC) constituents from releases of constituentsof other categorical pollutants controlled by NAAQS. EPA also is solicitingcomment on the ``routine'' vs. ``nonroutine'' distinction and the needto define ``routine'' in terms fo specific emission points or circumstances,and solicits comments on what emission points should be included. In addition,EPA is concerned that the first approach may lead to overreporting of routinereleases subject to adequate control under existing regulatory or permitlimits that could divert resources from releases requiring immediate response.EPA solicits information on the number of facilities and types of releasesthat would require reporting under these approaches, and the types of releasesthat would be excluded under either approach, particularly with respectto any potentially dangerous releases that may be excluded. In addition, the National Emission Standards for Hazardous Air Pollutants(NESHAPs) limits for radionuclides are health-based annual limits, whereasradionuclide RQs are reporting triggers based on 24-hour releases. TheAgency will require a report if an RQ above any annual NESHAP limit isreleased in a 24-hour period. The Agency requests comments on the numberof facilities and types of releases that may require reporting.\3\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ In support of the final rule adjusting the RQ for radionuclides(to be published in 1988), the Agency has prepared an Economic Impact Analysisthat estimates the cost to the government and regulated community causedby the revised radionuclide RQ reporting requirements. This document isavailable for public inspection in Room LG-100, U.S. Environmental ProtectionAgency, 401 M Street, SW., Washington, DC 20460 (Docket Number 102RQ-RN).<T3>Injection of Materials Related to Development of Crude Oil or NaturalGas Supplies. </T3>The injection of materials related to the productionof crude oil, natural gas, or water is considered a federally permittedrelease if the injection material is authorized specifically under applicableState law. Because it is probable that all conceivable injection modesare not considered in State laws, EPA, in the preamble to the May 25, 1983NPRM, interpreted the section 101(10)(I) provision to exempt only thoseactivities or materials that are authorized specifically by State law,rather than those that are not prohibited by State law. This interpretationensures that the appropriate authorities have consciously considered andintentionally authorized the injection activities and materials that areto be exempt from notification requirements and that the National ResponseCenter will be made aware immediately of the potential need to respondto releases that have not been evaluated previously by a permitting authority.EPA interprets the section 101(10)(I) exemption to apply only to thosematerials specifically authorized by State law to be used in activitieswhose sole purpose is the production of crude oil, natural gas, or water;the recovery of crude oil or natural gas; or the reinjection of fluidsbrought to the surface from such production. Some commenters objected tothis interpretation and instead supported a broader interpretation thatwould exempt from CERCLA notification all materials used in gas and oilfield operations. The National Response Center must be notified in anysituation involving the use of injection fluids or materials that are notauthorized specifically by State law for purposes of the development ofcrude oil or natural gas supplies and resulting in a release of a hazardoussubstance in an amount that equals or exceeds the applicable RQ. This willallow an immediate evaluation of the need for a response. <T3>Introduction of Pollutants into Publicly Owned Treatment Works. </T3>Arelease to a Publicly Owned Treatment Works (POTW) is subject to the federallypermitted release exemption if the release is (1) in compliance with applicablecategorical pretreatment standards and local limits developed in accordancewith 40 CFR 403.5(c), and (2) into a POTW with an approved local pretreatmentprogram or a andSection;403.10(e) State-administered local program. One ofthe commenters on the May 25, 1983 NPRM suggested that the Agency broadenits approach to the POTW exemption to provide that the discharge be incompliance only with general pretreatment requirements and not with site-specificrequirements. The Agency believes that for POTW to be considered ``federallypermitted,'' not only must the hazardous substance be a pollutant specifiedin applicable pretreatment standards and the release of the pollutant bein compliance with the categorical pretreatment standards, but the releasealso must be in compliance with the local limits developed on the basisof the site-specific conditions, because the categorical standards alonemay not be adequate to address the impact of pollutants on the POTW. Therefore,even though a release into a POTW is in compliance with the categoricalpretreatment standards, the National Response Center must be notified ifthe release exceeds the local limits by an RQ or more, because the releasemay cause interference with the POTW's processes or may pass through thePOTW to the navigable waters, either of which may result in a situationrequiring an emergency response. This exemption applies only to industrialusers \4\<NOTE/> discharging to POTWs; a POTW is subject to CERCLA reportingand liability provisions if its discharge of a hazardous substance violatesits NPDES permit by an RQ or more. POTWs are not required to report hazardoussubstances that are traveling through their collection systems in quantitiesthat equal or exceed RQs; however, the industrial user is responsible forreporting such releases into the collection system. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ ``Industrial users,'' as the term is used in this discussion,includes mobile sources discharging hazardous substances to a POTW.Sections 307(b)(1) and (c) of the CWA direct EPA to establish pretreatmentstandards ``to prevent the discharge of any pollutant through treatmentworks * * * which are publicly owned, which pollutant interferes with,passes through, or is otherwise incompatible with such works.'' These sectionsaddress the problems created by discharges of pollutants from nondomesticsources to municipal sewage treatment works that interfere with the POTWor pass through the POTW to navigable waters untreated or inadequatelytreated. Pretreatment standards are intended to prevent those problemsfrom occurring by requiring nondomestic users of POTWs to pretreat theirwastes before discharging them to the POTW. In 1977, Congress amended section402(b)(8) of the CWA to require POTWs to help regulate their industrialusers by establishing local programs to ensure that industrial users complywith pretreatment standards.In establishing the national pretreatment program to achieve these pretreatmentgoals, the Agency adopted a broad-based regulatory approach that implementsthe statutory prohibitions against pass through and interference at twobasic levels. The first is through the promulgation of national categoricalstandards that apply to certain industrial uses within selected categoriesof industries that commonly discharge toxic pollutants. Categorical standardsestablish numerical, technology-based discharge limits derived from anassessment of the types and amounts of pollutant discharges that typicallyinterfere with or pass through POTWs with secondary treatment facilities.The potential for many pass through or interference problems depends notonly on the nature of the discharge but also on local conditions (e.g.,the type of treatment process used by the POTW, local water quality, POTW'schosen method for handling sludge), and thus needs to be addressed on acase-by-case basis. Examples of such problems include discharges to a POTWthat may consist of pollutants not covered by a categorical standard orfrom nondomestic sources that are not in one of the industrial categoriesregulated by the categorical standards. Because categorical standards areestablished industry-wide, they cannot consider site-specific conditionsand therefore may not be adequate to prevent all pass through and interferenceeven for the regulated pollutants. EPA's General Pretreatment Regulations(40 CFR Part 403) address these areas of concern. First, 40 CFR 403.5(b)establishes specific prohibitions that apply to all nondomestic users andare designed to guard against common types of pollutant discharges thatmay result in interference and pass through (e.g., no discharge of flammable,explosive, or corrosive pollutants). Second, 40 CFR 403.5(a) establishesa general prohibition against pass through and interference that servesas a backup standard to address localized problems that occur. In addition,POTWs must develop and enforce specific local limits as part of their localpretreatment programs to prevent pass through and interference. POTWs notrequired to develop pretreatment programs also must develop local limitsif they have recurring pass through and interference (see 40 CFR 403.5(c)).The pretreatment standards a POTW user must meet to claim the federallypermitted release exemption include both applicable national categoricalstandards and standards established by local law as described below. Complianceonly with the general and specific prohibitions (40 CFR 403.5(a) and (b))of the general pretreatment regulations is insufficient to qualify a releaseas federally permitted.Only local limits applicable to the pollutant, developed in accordancewith 40 CFR 403.5(c), and designed to implement the general prohibitionagainst interference and pass through (andSection; 403.5(a)), can qualifythe release of such pollutant as a federally permitted release. The developmentof local limits under 40 CFR 403.5(c) involves three basic steps. First,a POTW must determine which, if any, of the pollutants discharged by itsindustrial users have a reasonable potential to pass through or interferewith the POTW. For each of the pollutants the POTW concludes may be ofconcern, the POTW must then determine the maximum amount of the pollutantit can accept (maximum headworks loading) and still prevent the occurrenceof pass through or interference. Finally, after maximum allowable headworksloadings are determined for each of the pollutants of concern, the POTWmust implement a system of local limits applicable to industrial usersto assure that these loadings will not be exceeded.EPA believes that only local limits that have been developed based uponprocedures that evaluate the site-specific characteristics and treatmentcapabilities of a POTW should qualify the release of the pollutant forthe exemption. Such an extensive analysis is needed to assure that passthrough and interference problems do not arise. A discharge of a pollutantby an industrial user in compliance with a local limit not designed usingthese procedures may not address the statutory prohibitions against passthrough and interference or provide the requisite degree of environmentalprotection to qualify for the federally permitted release exemption.Thus, a release that exceeds by an RQ or more an applicable categoricalpretreatment standard or a local limit developed in accordance with 40CFR 403.5(c) must be reported. Moreover, the absence of a categorical pretreatmentstandard or a local limit for a specific pollutant precludes coverage forreleases of that pollutant under the federally permitted release exemption.If an industrial user releases an RQ or more of a hazardous substance intoa POTW that has not set a local limit for such a substance, or for whichthere is no limit based on a categorical standard, then the release isnot federally permitted and is subject to CERCLA reporting and liabilityprovisions.Furthermore, the release of a pollutant to a POTW only would qualify forthe federally permitted release exemption if (1) the POTW has a local pretreatmentprogram approved by the ``approved authority'' (as defined in andSection;403.3(c)), or (2) a State, in lieu of the municipality, is implementinga pretreatment program for that POTW pursuant to 40 CFR 403.10(e).Section 101(10)(J) provides that the pretreatment program must be ``submittedby a State or municipality for Federal approval.'' The Agency interpretsthis provision to mean that the program not only must be submitted forapproval but must be approved. A strict reading of the statutory languagewould be contrary to the expressed congressional intent that dischargesof hazardous substances into sewer systems qualify as federally permittedreleases only if they are authorized under a pretreatment program (S. Rep.No. 848, 96th Cong., 2nd Sess. 48 (1980)). The fact that a POTW has submitteda program for approval does not necessarily mean the program is adequateto control the introduction of pollutants from nondomestic users of thePOTW. Such a program may not be approved by the approval authority dueto major deficiencies. For the discharge to be a federally permitted release,therefore, it must be specifically regulated in an approved program, aprogram that the approval authority has determined is consistent with thefederally mandated minimum standard.An approved program may be (1) designed and implemented locally by a POTWand approved by either EPA or an EPA-approved State pretreatment program,or (2) designed and implemented by an EPA-approved State pretreatment program.EPA approval of a State pretreatment program pursuant to section 402(b)of the CWA would not automatically qualify a release to a POTW in thatState as federally permitted. The local pretreatment program must be approvedeither by EPA or by an EPA-approved State program. Generally, EPA approvalof a State pretreatment program merely changes the approval authority forthe POTW programs from EPA to the EPA-approved State pretreatment program.The approved State has primary responsibility for requiring local POTWsto develop and implement a pretreatment program to regulate users directly.The fact that a State pretreatment program has been approved by EPA doesnot in and of itself change the quality or approvability of local POTWprograms. POTWs in approved States would still need to develop local pretreatmentprograms and receive pretreatment program approval if they have not doneso already. Thus, to satisfy the federally permitted release exemption,individual approval of each POTW pretreatment program is necessary (exceptfor a State administered andSection; 403.10(e) program as described below).Section 403.10(e) allows the State in lieu of the POTW to assume responsibilityfor developing and implementing POTW pretreatment program requirements.Because the andSection; 403.10(e) program must meet the same standard aswould be required for pretreatment programs developed by a municipality(andSection; 403.8(f)), EPA believes that the andSection; 403.10(e) programsare the State pretreatment programs Congress intended to include undersection 101(10)(J).In the event that a State's andSection; 403.10(e) program does not extendto all its POTWs, only those releases to POTWs for which the State hasimplemented the pretreatment program pursuant to andSection; 403.10(e) wouldqualify as federally permitted. If a POTW is not regulated directly byits State NPDES program, the POTW nevertheless must implement an approvedlocal pretreatment program in order for the discharges of industrial usersto qualify for the federally permitted release exemption.In summary, for a release to a POTW to be subject to the federally permittedrelease exemption, the release must be: (1) In compliance with applicablecategorical pretreatment standards and local limits developed in accordancewith 40 CFR 403.5(c), and (2) into a POTW with an approved local pretreatmentprogram or a 40 CFR 403.10(e) State administered local program.One of the commenters on the May 25, 1983 NPRM stated that discharges intoa POTW are transfers between facilities, not ``into the environment,''and therefore all discharges into POTWs should be exempt from CERCLA reporting.The commenter's approach to defining ``into the environment'' is not consistentwith the approach in today's proposal. To determine whether its releaseis federally permitted, therefore, an industrial user should measure itsdischarge at the point the substance leaves the industrial user's facility.In the case of indirect dischargers, the release should be measured whenit leaves the discharger's building. Mobile sources should measure thedischarge at the point it is released into the POTW, which will be at theheadworks in most cases. Industrial users are not required under CERCLAto conduct monitoring activities different from those required by the applicablepretreatment program.<T3>Releases of Source, Byproduct, or Special Nuclear Material.</T3> Radionuclides(which include source, byproduct, and special nuclear material) are listedgenerically under section 112 of the CAA and are therefore considered hazardoussubstances under CERCLA. CERCLA section 101(22)(C), however, excludes fromthe definition of ``release'' the discharge of:<ITAG tagnum="20">source, byproduct, or special nuclear material from a nuclear incident,as those terms are defined in the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, if such releaseis subject to requirements with respect to financial protection establishedby the Nuclear Regulatory Commission under section 170 of such Act, or,for the purposes of section 104 of this title or any other response action,any release of source, byproduct, or special nuclear material from anyprocessing site designated under section 102(a)(1) or 302(a) of the UraniumMill Tailings Radiation Control Act of 1978 [UMTRCA] * * *.</ITAG>It should be noted that releases of source, byproduct, or special nuclearmaterial from processing sites designated under section 102(a)(1) or section302(a) UMTRCA are exempted from CERCLA response action provisions but notfrom reporting requirements under CERCLA section 103.CERCLA section 101(10)(K) includes within the definition of federally permittedrelease, releases of source, byproduct, or special nuclear material thatcomply with the conditions of a legally enforceable license, permit, regulation,or order issued pursuant to the Atomic Energy Act (AEA). Therefore, releasesof source, byproduct, or special nuclear material that exceed the licensedor permitted levels by an RQ or more, and that are not excluded by section101(22), must be reported immediately to the National Response Center.Under the AEA, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission is responsible for issuinglicenses for the possession and use of source, byproduct, and special nuclearmaterial. States that have entered into an agreement with the Nuclear RegulatoryCommission (i.e., Agreement States) are also authorized under the AEA toissue licenses for the possession and use of source, byproduct, or specialnuclear material. Releases of source, byproduct, or special nuclear materialin compliance with licenses issued by the Nuclear Regulatory Commissionor Agreement States are federally permitted releases under CERCLA section101(10)(K).The regulations of the Nuclear Regulatory Commission contain several importantexemptions from their provisions, some of which are based on the smallquantities of material involved or the low levels of radioactivity thematerials emit. The Nuclear Regulatory Commission has developed ``exemptedquantities'' for purposes of identifying facilities that are not subjectto Commission licensing requirements. These quantities are smaller thanthe radionuclide RQs and, therefore, releases from these facilities willnot be reported under CERCLA. Nevertheless, these releases are not federallypermitted under CERCLA and, therefore, these facilities are subject tothe CERCLA section 107 liability provisions.Some releases of source, byproduct, and special nuclear material may complywith licenses, permits, orders, or regulations issued under the AEA throughprovisions administered not by the Commission or its Agreement States,but by DOE, the Department of Defense, or EPA. For example, DOE governsits radiation protection activities under the AEA by a series of internalorders. When such orders are issued under DOE's AEA authority and releasesof source, byproduct, or special nuclear material are in compliance withthe applicable order(s), these releases are federally permitted under section101(10)(K).\5\<NOTE/> The Department of Defense issues regulations under the AEAgoverning weapons and reactors within its jurisdiction, and EPA issuesregulations under the AEA for certain operations involving radioactivematerial (e.g., 40 CFR Parts 190, 191, and 192). Releases of source, byproduct,or special nuclear material in compliance with these regulations are alsofederally permitted under section 101(10)(K). Any release that is an RQor more above federally permitted levels, however, would be subject tothe CERCLA notification requirements.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ Under the DOE procurement regulations, provisions of therelevant DOE environmental and safety orders must be incorporated by referenceinto contracts entered into with managers and operators of DOE facilities(see 48 CFR 970.2303-2, 970.5204-2, 970.5104-26(b)). By virtue of theirincorporation into binding contracts, the provisions of the DOE ordersbecome binding on the managers and operators of DOE facilities and areenforceable by DOE on the basis of the facility management and operationcontracts.Further clarification is needed regarding the applicability of the definitionof federally permitted releases to a fourth category of radioactive materialcalled naturally occurring and accelerator-produced radioactive material(NARM). The AEA gives DOE broad authority to control its radiation-relatedactivities and to protect public health and safety and the environment.This authority applies to activities involving NARM, as well as activitiesinvolving source, byproduct, and special nuclear material. CERCLA section101(10)(K) refers, however, only to releases of source, byproduct, andspecial nuclear material. Thus, it provides no basis for exempting DOE'sNARM releases from CERCLA's reporting and liability provisions. Furthermore,the AEA currently does not give authority to the Nuclear Regulatory Commissionto license NARM, only source, byproduct, and special nuclear material.Although Agreement States may regulate NARM, this regulatory authorityis not federally derived. Therefore, releases of NARM are not consideredfederally permitted under section 101(10)(K). Certain NARM releases are,however, considered federally permitted under other CERCLA sections. Forexample, air releases of NARM that are in compliance with NESHAPs are federallypermitted under section 101(10)(H).In making this finding with respect to NARM and the definition of federallypermitted releases in section 101(10)(K), the Agency wishes to differentiatebetween NARM, source material, and byproduct material. Both source andbyproduct material are defined under the AEA to include certain naturallyoccurring radionuclides. Specifically, source material is natural uranium,natural thorium, or ores that contain 0.05 percent or more (by weight)of natural uranium or thorium. Byproduct material is defined to includenaturally occurring decay products of uranium or thorium when those decayproducts are associated with mill tailings. The exclusion of NARM fromthe definition of federally permitted releases under section 101(10)(K)applies only to those naturally occurring radionuclides that do not qualifyas either source or byproduct material. For example, naturally occurringradium used in medical and well logging devices does not meet the definitionof source or byproduct material and, therefore, releases of radium fromthese devices does not qualify for the reporting exemption under section101(10)(K).All of the commenters on the radionuclides exemption felt that a broaderexemption is warranted. Some commenters suggested that reports of releasescurrently required by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission are sufficientand comprehensive because they enable the Commission to determine the needfor and the adequacy of response. These commenters felt that any additionalreports to the National Response Center would be an unnecessary burden.EPA expects that most releases involving radionuclides will be excludedfrom the definition of release, will be federally permitted, or will involvea quantity smaller than the RQ. (The Agency published a rule that proposedRQs for radionuclides on March 16, 1987 in 52 FR 8172; these RQs are beingrevised and the Agency expects to publish final RQs for radionuclides in1988.) EPA believes, however, that the reporting requirements imposed onthe remaining releases of radionuclides, including releases not subjectto or in compliance with applicable permits, regulations, or orders, areessential to mitigate the risk to public health or welfare or the environmentposed by such releases.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Notification for Certain Types of Releases</ITAG>A. In GeneralThis section addresses several recurring questions not related specificallyto the definition of ``federally permitted release'' but that arise underthe CERCLA section 103(a) reporting requirements. One such question involvesreleases to engineered structures designed specifically to prevent materialsfrom reaching the land surface. The issues involve both interpretationof the phrase ``release into the environment'' and the appropriatenessof CERCLA notification requirements for releases to such secondary containmentdevices. The Agency solicits comments on the following issues.In the preamble to the April 4, 1985 final rule adjusting RQs for 340 CERCLAhazardous substance, EPA stated:<ITAG tagnum="21">Hazardous substances may be released ``into the environment'' evenif they remain on plant or installation grounds. Examples of such releasesare spills from tanks or valves onto concrete pads or into ditches opento the outside aid, releases from pipes into open lagoons or ponds, orany other discharges that are not wholly contained within buildings orstructures. Such a release, if it occurs in a reportable quantity (e.g.,evaporation of an RQ into the air from a dike or concrete pad), must bereported under CERCLA. On the other hand, hazardous substances may be spilledat a plant or installation but not enter the environment, e.g., when thesubstance spills onto the concrete floor of an enclosed manufacturing plant.Such a spill would need to be reported only if the substances were in someway to leave the building or structure in a reportable quantity. (Note,however, that the federal government may still respond and recover costswhere there is a threatened release into the environment.) 50 FR 13462.</ITAG>In applying the phrase ``into the environment'' to releases to secondarycontainment devices, EPA believes that a release inside a building or structureis not a release ``into the environment'' unless the spilled substanceleaves the building.On one hand, a release to a secondary containment device that is not whollycontained and that is located outside of a building or structure is ``intothe environment.'' Examples of releases to such devices that illustrateboth the potential for a serious problem and an existing serious situationhave been brought to the Agency's attention. These include a release ofhydrochloric acid to a dike that would have overflowed in a heavy rain,and radioactive contamination of water supplies apparently resulting froman improperly functioning secondary containment device at a nuclear facility.On the other hand, it has been suggested that where engineered structuresare open to the air, releases into such structures should be exempt fromCERCLA notification unless an RQ or more of the substance reaches any groundor surface waters or land surface or evaporates into the ambient air. Releasesto such structures may include such occurrences as releases onto concretepads, secondary containment devices with sealed floors around storage tanks,or drip pans used to catch minor hose or line drainage.The Agency is interested in receiving comments and data discussing thecircumstances under which immediate notification of releases into secondarycontainment devices would not provide useful information for Federal responsepurposes under CERCLA. EPA is particularly interested in information onthe significance of the issue, specific examples of procedures followedwhere there is a release to a secondary containment device and techniquesused to prevent releases from such devices, data discussing the integrityof secondary containment devices, and suggestions on the appropriate meansof eliminating any such unnecessary reporting. If the Agency decides toexempt from CERCLA notification certain releases into secondary containmentdevices, a demonstration may be required to show that the device is sufficientlyprotective and reliable.B. PCB Waste DisposalA second issue concerning the necessity for section 103 notification iswhether approved polychlorinated biphenyl (PCB) disposal by incineration,landfilling, or alternate methods needs to be reported as a release undersection 103. Because PCB disposal approvals under the Toxic SubstancesControl Act (TSCA) are not included in the CERCLA section 101(10) definitionof federally permitted release, EPA does not believe that it has the authorityto apply that exemption to such approvals.At the same time, however, EPA does not believe that notification undersection 103 of CERCLA provides any significant additional benefit so longas the disposal facility is in substantial compliance with all applicableregulations and approval conditions. The PCB regulations under TSCA, 40CFR Part 761, require owners or operators of PCB disposal facilities, incinerators,chemical waste landfills, and high efficiency boilers to obtain writtenEPA approval, based on compliance with detailed technical requirementsdesigned to ensure proper disposal, before accepting PCB wastes. The TSCAapproval process is designed to ensure that the operation of PCB disposalfacilities does not present an unreasonable risk of injury to health orthe environment from PCBs. In addition, 40 CFR Part 761, Subpart J, requiresPCB disposal facility owners or operators to monitor carefully the facility'sinventory and operation, maintain detailed records for periods of 5 to20 years, and report under certain circumstances. The TSCA regulationsprovide the Federal government with the information necessary to determinewhether an emergency response to a PCB disposal is required. Today's proposalnot to require CERCLA reporting for EPA-approved PCB disposals is consistentwith the overall objective of the CERCLA notification requirements. Therefore,EPA will not require reporting under section 103(a) of the approved, properdisposal of PCB wastes into a disposal facility. The Agency requests commentson this proposal to exempt administratively these releases from CERCLAnotification.A party responsible for a release of PCB wastes that need not be reportedunder CERCLA, however, remains liable for the costs of cleaning up therelease and for any natural resource damages caused by the release. Inaddition, where the disposer knows that the facility is not in compliancewith applicable regulations and approved conditions under TSCA, disposalof an RQ or more of PCB waste must be reported to the National ResponseCenter. Likewise, spills and accidents occurring during disposal and outsideof the approved operation and that result in releases of an RQ or moreof PCB waste must be reported to the National Response Center. Finally,PCB releases of an RQ or more from a TSCA-approved facility (as opposedto disposal into such a facility) must be reported under CERCLA.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Discharges to POTW's</ITAG>The Agency recognizes that the regulation implementing CWA section 311for hazardous substance discharges must be revised to be consistent withthe Agency's regulatory approach taken under CERCLA section 101(10)(J).Under CERCLA seciton 101(10)(J), an indirect discharge to a POTW must besubject to and in compliance with categorical pretreatment standards andlocal limits applicable in an approved local pretreatment program (seediscussion under Section III of today's preamble). All indirect dischargers,ie., both mobile and stationary sources, are subject to the same requirementsfor their discharges to be considered federally permitted releases.Under 40 CFR 117.13, mobile sources discharging industrial waste are notsubject to CWA section 311 coverage if the mobile source has contractedwith, or otherwise received written permission from the POTW to dischargea designated quantity of industrial waste treated to comply with effluentlimitations (under CWA sections 301, 302, or 306) or pretreatment standards(under CWA section 307). Indirect dischargers are not addressed under andSection;117.13. Paragraph (a) of andSection; 117.13 was reserved to provide the conditionsunder which indirect discharges are subject to CWA section 311.The Agency is proposing to amend 40 CFR 117.13 to state that indirect dischargesare not subject to section 311 coverage if the indirect discharge is incompliance with applicable categorical pretreatment standards and locallimits developed in accordance with 40 CFR 403.5(c) and is into a POTWwith an approved local pretreatment program or a 40 CFR 403.10(e) Stateadministered local program. EPA also is proposing to revise paragraph (b)to apply the same conditions to mobile sources as would be applied to indirectdischarges under paragraph (a). The Agency requests comments on this proposal.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Regulatory Analyses</ITAG>A. Executive Order No. 12291Rulemaking protocol under Executive Order (E.O.) 12291 requires that proposedregulations be classified as major or nonmajor for purposes of review bythe Office of Management and Budget (OMB). According to E.O. 12291, majorrules are regulations that are likely to result in:<ITAG tagnum="21">(1) An annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more; or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) A major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individualindustries, Federal, States, or local government agencies, or geographicregions; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or on the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.</ITAG>Today's regulation is nonmajor, because adoption of the rule will resultin zero costs and will not cause any of the significant adverse effectsmentioned in (3) above. The Background Document for the Proposed Regulationon Federally Permitted Releases, available for inspection in the publicdocket, shows that the proposed rule is simply a clarification of existingstatutory requirements. This rule has been submitted to OMB for review, as required by E.O. 12291.B. Regulatory Flexibility Act The Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 requires that a Regulatory FlexibilityAnalysis be performed for all rules that are likely to have a ``significantimpact on a substantial number of small entities.'' Today's proposed ruleis not expected to significantly impact small entities because the ruleproposes simply to clarify the existing statutory requirement. EPA certifies,therefore, that this proposed regulation will not have a significant impacton a substantial number of small entities and that a Regulatory FlexibilityAnalysis is not required. C. Paperwork Reduction ActThere are no reporting or recordkeeping provisions included in this proposedrule that require approval from the Office of Management and Budget undersection 3504(h) of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, 44 U.S.C. 3501et seq. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>40 CFR Part 117Hazardous Substances, Penalties, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Water pollution control. 40 CFR Part 302Air pollution control, Chemicals, Hazardous materials transportation, Hazardoussubstances, Intergovernmental relations, Natural resources, Nuclear materials,Pesticides, and pests, Radioactive materials, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Superfund, Waste treatment and disposal, Water pollutioncontrol. 40 CFR Part 355Chemical accident prevention, Chemical emergency preparedness, Chemicals,Community emergency response plan, Community right-to-know, Contingencyplanning, Extremely hazardous substances, Hazardous substances, Reportablequantity, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Threshold planningquantity.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: July 11, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Lee M. Thomas, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator. </ITAG>For the reasons set out in the premble, it is proposed to amend Title 40of the Code of Federal Regulations as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 117_DETERMINATION OF REPORTABLE QUANTITIES FOR HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCES</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 117 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 33 U.S.C. 1321 and 1361.</ITAG>2. Section 117.12 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 117.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability to discharges from facilities with NPDES permits. </ITAG>(a) This regulation does not apply to:(1) Discharges in compliance with a permit under section 402 of the CleanWater Act; (2) Discharges resulting from circumstances identified and reviewed andmade a part of the public record with respect to a permit issued or modifiedunder section 402 of the Clean Water Act, and subject to a condition insuch permit; or (3) Continuous or anticipated intermittent discharges from a point source,identified in a permit or permit application under section 402 of the CleanWater Act, which are caused by events occurring within the scope of relevantoperating or treatment systems. (b) A discharge is ``in compliance with a permit issued under section 402of the Clean Water Act'' if the permit contains an effluent limitationspecifically applicabale to the substance discharged or an effluent limitationapplicable to another waste parameter that has been specifically identifiedin the permit as intended to limit such substance, and the discharge isin compliance with the effluent limitation. (c) A discharge results ``from circumstances identified and reviewed andmade a part of the public record with respect to a permit issued or modifiedunder section 402 of the Clean Water Act, and subject to a condition insuch permit'' where: (1) The permit application, the permit, or another portion of the publicrecord contains documents that specifically identify: (i) The substances and the amounts of substances; and (ii) The origin and source of the substances; and (iii) The treatment that is to be provided for the discharge either by:(A) An on-site treatment system separate from any treatment system treatingthe permittee's normal discharge; or (B) A treatment system that is designed to treat the permittee's normaldischarge and that is additionally capable of treating the identified amountof the identified substance; or (C) Any combination of the above; and (2) The permit contains a requirement that the substances and the amountsof the substances, as identified in andSection;117.12(c)(1)(i) and andSection;117.12(c)(1)(ii),be treated pursuant to andSection; 117.12(c)(1)(iii) in the event of an on-siterelease; and (3) The treatment to be provided is in place. (d) A discharge is a ``continuous or anticipated intermittent'' discharge``from a point source, identified in a permit or permit application undersection 402 of the Clean Water Act,'' and ``caused by events occurringwithin the scope of relevant operating or treatment systems'', whetheror not the discharge is in compliance with the permit, if: (1) The hazardous substance is discharged from a point source for whicha valid permit exists or for which a permit application has been submitted;and (2) The discharge of the hazardous substance results from:(i) The contamination of noncontact cooling water or storm water, providedthat such cooling water or storm water is not contaminated by an onsitespill of a hazardous substance; or(ii) A continuous or anticipated intermittent discharge of process wastewater, and where the discharge originates within the manufacturing or treatmentsystems; or(iii) An upset or failure of a treatment system or of a process producinga continuous or anticipated intermittent discharge where the upset or failureresults from a control problem, a system failure or malfunction, an equipmentor system startup or shutdown, an equipment wash, or a production schedulechange, provided that such upset or failure is not caused by an on-sitespill of a hazardous substance.3. Section 117.13 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 117.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability to discharges from other facilities.</ITAG>(a) These regulations apply to all discharges of reportable quantitiesto a POTW, where the discharge originates from stationary industrial users,so long as the discharge is:(1) In compliance with applicable categorical pretreatment standards andlocal limits developed in accordance with 40 CFR 403.5(c); and(2) Into a POTW with an approved local pretreatment program or a 40 CFR403.10(e) State administered local program.(b) These regulations apply to all discharges of reportable quantitiesto a POTW, where the discharge originates from a mobile source, so longas the mobile source can show that:(1) Prior to accepting the substance from an industrial discharger, thesubstance being discharged was in compliance with applicable categoricalpretreatment standards and local limits developed in accordance with 40CFR 403.5(c); and(2) The substance is being discharged into a POTW with an approved localpretreatment program or a 40 CFR 403.10(e) State administered local program.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 302_DESIGNATION, REPORTABLE QUANTITIES, AND NOTIFICATION</ITAG>4. The authority citation for Part 302 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 9602; 33 U.S.C. 1321 and 1361.</ITAG>5. Section 302.3 is amended by adding in alphabetical order the definition``federally permitted release'' and by revising the introductory text ofthe definition ``release'' to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 302.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Federally permitted release'' means(1) A discharge in compliance with a permit under section 402 of the CleanWater Act;(2) A discharge resulting from circumstances identified and reviewed andmade a part of the public record with respect to a permit issued or modifiedunder section 402 of the Clean Water Act and subject to a condition insuch permit;(3) A continuous or anticipated intermittent discharge from a point source,identified in a permit or permit application under section 402 of the CleanWater Act, which is caused by events occurring within the scope of relevantoperating or treatment systems;(4) A discharge in compliance with a legally enforceable Federal or State,individual or general permit under section 404 of the Clean Water Act;(5) A release in compliance with a legally enforceable Federal or Statefinal permit issued pursuant to section 3005 (a) through (d) of the SolidWaste Disposal Act from a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposalfacility when such permit specifically identifies the hazardous substancesand makes such substances subject to a standard of practice, control procedure,or bioassay limitation or condition, or other control on the hazardoussubstances in such a release;(6) Any release in compliance with a legally enforceable permit issuedunder section 102 or section 103 of the Marine Protection, Research, andSanctuaries Act of 1972;(7) Any injection of fluids authorized under Federal underground injectioncontrol programs or State programs submitted for Federal approval (andnot disapproved by the Administrator) pursuant to Part C of the Safe DrinkingWater Act;(8) Any emission of a substance into the air which is named specificallyor is included in a specifically named group of substances subject to andin compliance with a permit or control regulation under section 111, section112, Title I Part C, Title I Part D, or State implementation plans submittedin accordance with section 110 of the Clean Air Act (and not disapprovedby the Administrator) when such permit or control regulation is specificallydesigned to limit or eliminate such emission of a designated hazardouspollutant or a criteria pollutant, including any schedule or waiver granted,promulgated, or approved under these sections;(9) Any injection of fluids or other materials specifically authorizedunder applicable State law: solely for the purpose of stimulating or treatingwells for the production of crude oil, natural gas, or water; solely forthe purpose of secondary, tertiary, or other enhanced recovery of crudeoil or natural gas; or which are brought to the surface in conjunctionwith the production of crude oil or natural gas and which are reinjected;(10) The introduction of any pollutant into a publicly owned treatmentworks (POTW) when such pollutant is specified in and in compliance withapplicable categorical pretreatment standards and local limits developedin accordance with 40 CFR 403.5(c) And into a POTW with an approved localpretreatment program or a 40 CFR 403.10(e) State administered local program;and(11) Any release of source, special nuclear, or byproduct material, asthose terms are defined in the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, in compliancewith a legally enforceable license, permit, regulation, or other issuedpursuant to the Atomic Energy Act of 1954.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Federally permitted releases do not include releases exempt from regulationunder the authority of one of the cited statutes; releases not in compliancewith the applicable permit limit or condition, license, regulation, order,standard, or program; or releases into a medium other than that coveredin the applicable permit, license, regulation, order, standard, or program.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Release'' means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying,discharging, injecting, escaping, leaching, dumping, or disposing intothe environment (including the abandonment or discarding of barrels, containers,and other closed receptacles containing any hazardous substance or pollutantor contaminant), but excludes * * *<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>6. Section 302.6 is amended by adding new paragraphs (e) and (f) as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 302.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notification requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) Whenever a release of a hazardous substance exceeds its federally permittedlevel as defined under andSection; 302.3 (``federally permitted release'')by a reportable quantity or more, notification shall be made for such releasein accordance with the requirements of this section or, if applicable,andSection; 302.8. Where numerical levels for hazardous substances are notspecified, any release not in compliance with the terms, related to thecharacter or quantity of the release, of the applicable permit, license,regulation, order, standard or program that equals or exeeds a reportablequantity must be reported to the National Response Center in accordancewith this section or, if applicable, andSection; 302.8.(f) Notification is not required for the disposal of polychlorinated biphenyl(PCB) approved by EPA and in substantial compliance with the applicableToxic Substance Control Act (TSCA) regulations, 40 CFR Part 761, and approvalconditions.7. Section 302.7 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(3) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 302.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Penalties.</ITAG>(a) * * *(3) In charge of a facility from which a hazardous substance is released,other than a federally permitted release, in a quantity equal to or greaterthan that reportable quantity determined under this part who fails to notifyimmediately the National Response Center as soon as he or she has knowledgeof such release or who submits in such a notification any information whichhe or she knows to be false and misleading shall be subject to all of thesanctions, including criminal penalties, set forth in section 103(b) ofthe Act.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 355_EMERGENCY PLANNING AND NOTIFICATION</ITAG>8. The authority citation for Part 355 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 11002 and 11048.</ITAG>9. Section 355.40 is amended by revising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 355.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Emergency release notification.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Applicability. </T3>(1) The requirements of this section apply to anyfacility:(i) At which a hazardous chemical is produced, used, or stored; and (ii) At which there is a release of a reportable quantity of any extremelyhazardous substance of CERCLA hazardous substance.(2) This section does not apply to:(i) Any release that results in exposure to persons solely within the boundariesof the facility;(ii) Any release that is a ``federally permitted release,'' as definedas follows:(A) A discharge in compliance with a permit under section 402 of the CleanWater Act;(B) A discharge resulting from circumstances identified and reviewed andmade a part of the public record with respect to a permit issued or modifiedunder section 402 of the Clean Water Act, and subject to a condition insuch permit;(C) A continuous or anticipated intermittent discharge from a point source,identified in a permit or permit application under section 402 of the CleanWater Act, which is caused by events occurring within the scope of relevantoperating or treatment systems;(D) A discharge in compliance with a legally enforceable Federal or State,individual or general permit under section 404 of the Clean Water Act;(E) A release in compliance with a legally enforceable Federal or Statefinal permit issued pursuant to section 3005(a) through (d) of the SolidWaste Disposal Act from a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposalfacility when such permit specifically identifies the hazardous substancesand makes such substances subject to a standard of practice, control procedure,or bioassay limitation or condition, or other control on the hazardoussubstances in such a release;(F) Any release in compliance with a legally enforceable permit issuedunder section 102 or section 103 of the Marine Protection, Research, andSanctuaries Act of 1972;(G) Any injection of fluids authorized under Federal underground injectioncontrol programs or State programs submitted for Federal approval (andnot disapproved by the Administrator) pursuant to Part C of the Safe DrinkingWater Act;(H) Any emission of a substance into the air which is named specificallyor is included in a specifically named group of substances subject to andin compliance with a permit or control regulation under section 111, section112, Title I Part C, Title I Part D, or State implementation plans submittedin accordance with section 110 of the Clean Air Act (and not disapprovedby the Administrator) when such permit or control regulation is specificallydesigned to limit or eliminate such emission of a designated hazardouspollutant or a criteria pollutant, including any schedule or waiver granted,promulgated, or approved under these sections;(I) Any injection of fluids or other materials specifically authorizedunder applicable State law: solely for the purpose of stimulating or treatingwells for the production of crude oil, natural gas, or water; solely forthe purpose of secondary, tertiary, or other enhanced recovery of crudeoil or natural gas; or which are brought to the surface in conjunctionwith the production of crude oil or natural gas and which are reinjected;(J) The introduction of any pollutant into a publicly owned treatment works(POTW) when such pollutant is specified in and in compliance with applicablecategorical pretreatment standards and local limits developed in accordancewith 40 CFR 403.5(c) and into a POTW with an approved pretreatment programor a 40 CFR 403.10(e) State administered local program; and (K) Any release of source, special nuclear, or byproduct material, as thoseterms are defined in the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, in compliance witha legally enforceable license, permit, regulation, or order issued pursuantto the Atomic Energy Act of 1954.(iii) Federally permitted releases do not include releases exempt fromregulation under the authority of one of the cited statutes; releases notin compliance with the applicable permit limit or condition, license, regulation,order, standard, or program; or releases into a medium other than thatcovered in the applicable permit, license, regulation, order, standard,or program.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-16192 Filed 7-18-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>